public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi '-er/'-ar
# themeT1 + [ea]r/b0b1b2E0E1E2
# themeT4 + rò/b0b1b2J0
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2E0E1E2I0J0
SFX b0 Y 155
SFX b0 0 e [ea]r
SFX b0 0 me/G0G1 [ea]r
SFX b0 0 mene/G0 [ae]r
SFX b0 0 ne/K0 [ea]r
SFX b0 erò ando/E0E1E2 erò
SFX b0 erò anto/E0E1E2 erò
SFX b0 erò do/B0 uerò
SFX b0 erò iede/N0 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò iege/N0 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò ime/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò imo/E0E1E2J0 erò
SFX b0 erò indo/E0E1E2 erò
SFX b0 erò into/E0E1E2 erò
SFX b0 erò ion/E0E1E2J0 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò ione/K0 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò ionme/G0G1 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò isen/J0 erò
SFX b0 erò isene/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò isense erò
SFX b0 erò isiede/N0 erò
SFX b0 erò isiege/N0 erò
SFX b0 erò ision/J0 erò
SFX b0 erò isione/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò isionse erò
SFX b0 erò isié/N0 erò
SFX b0 erò ison/J0 erò
SFX b0 erò isone/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò isonse erò
SFX b0 erò iven/J0 erò
SFX b0 erò ivene/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò ivense erò
SFX b0 erò ivion/J0 erò
SFX b0 erò ivione/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò ivionse erò
SFX b0 erò ivié/N0 erò
SFX b0 erò iviéu/O0 erò
SFX b0 erò ivon/J0 erò
SFX b0 erò ivone/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò ivonse erò
SFX b0 erò ié/N0 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò iéu/O0 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò iónmene/G0 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b0 erò on/E0E1E2J0 erò
SFX b0 erò one/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò onme/G0G1 erò
SFX b0 erò udo/B0 [^u]erò
SFX b0 erò àndome/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò àndomene/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò àntome/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò àntomene/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò é/F0N0 erò
SFX b0 erò éa/F0J0N0 erò
SFX b0 erò éane/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò éau/O0 erò
SFX b0 erò ée/J0 erò
SFX b0 erò éene/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò éi/J0L0N0 erò
SFX b0 erò éimo/J0 erò
SFX b0 erò éimoe/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò éitu/M0 erò
SFX b0 erò émene/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò émoe/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò émome/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò émomene/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò éndome/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò éndomene/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò éntome/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò éntomene/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò éo/J0 erò
SFX b0 erò éone/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò érme/G0G1 erò
SFX b0 erò érmene/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò ésimo erò
SFX b0 erò éu/O0 erò
SFX b0 erò évane/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò évau/O0 erò
SFX b0 erò évene/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò évimo/J0 erò
SFX b0 erò évimoe/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò évitu/M0 erò
SFX b0 erò évone/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò í/F0N0 erò
SFX b0 erò ímene/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò ímoe/K0 erò
SFX b0 erò íu/O0 erò
SFX b0 erò ónmene/G0 erò
SFX b0 erò ú/B0 [^u]erò
SFX b0 rò de erò
SFX b0 rò ge erò
SFX b0 rò me/G0 erò
SFX b0 rò mo/E0E1E2J0 erò
SFX b0 rò n/J0 erò
SFX b0 rò ndo/E0E1E2 erò
SFX b0 rò ne/K0 erò
SFX b0 rò nse erò
SFX b0 rò nte/T0I0 erò
SFX b0 rò nto/E0E1E2 erò
SFX b0 rò se/I0T0 erò
SFX b0 rò sto/B0I0 erò
SFX b0 rò va/F0J0N0 erò
SFX b0 rò ve/J0 erò
SFX b0 rò vi/J0L0N0 erò
SFX b0 rò vo/J0 erò
SFX b0 uerò ú/B0 uerò
SFX b0 ò ane/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò atu/M0 ò
SFX b0 ò ave/F0 ò
SFX b0 ò emo/E0E1E2J0 ò
SFX b0 ò en/J0 ò
SFX b0 ò ene/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò ense ò
SFX b0 ò esi/N0 ò
SFX b0 ò esiu/O0 ò
SFX b0 ò imo/E0E1E2J0 ò
SFX b0 ò ion/E0E1E2J0 ò
SFX b0 ò ione/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò ionme/G0G1 ò
SFX b0 ò isen/J0 ò
SFX b0 ò isene/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò isense ò
SFX b0 ò ision/J0 ò
SFX b0 ò isione/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò isionse ò
SFX b0 ò isié/N0 ò
SFX b0 ò isiéu/O0 ò
SFX b0 ò ison/J0 ò
SFX b0 ò isone/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò isonse ò
SFX b0 ò ié/N0 ò
SFX b0 ò iéu/O0 ò
SFX b0 ò iónmene/G0 ò
SFX b0 ò on/E0E1E2J0 ò
SFX b0 ò one/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò onme/G0G1 ò
SFX b0 ò à/F0J0L0 ò
SFX b0 ò àe/F0 ò
SFX b0 ò è/J0 ò
SFX b0 ò ène/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò é/N0 ò
SFX b0 ò émoe/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò émome/G0 ò
SFX b0 ò émomene/G0 ò
SFX b0 ò ésimo/J0 ò
SFX b0 ò ésimoe/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò ésitu/M0 ò
SFX b0 ò éu/O0 ò
SFX b0 ò í/N0 ò
SFX b0 ò ía/F0J0L0 ò
SFX b0 ò íane/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò íatu/M0 ò
SFX b0 ò íe/F0J0 ò
SFX b0 ò íene/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò ímoe/K0 ò
SFX b0 ò íu/O0 ò
SFX b0 ò ónmene/G0 ò

# vèrbi '-er/'-ar
# themeT1 + [ea]r/b0b1b2E0E1E2
# themeT4 + rò/b0b1b2J0
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2E0E1E2I0J0
SFX b1 Y 40
SFX b1 0 melo/G1 [ae]r
SFX b1 ar àrmelo/G1 ar
SFX b1 er érmelo/G1 er
SFX b1 erò ilo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò iónmelo/G1 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b1 erò àndolo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò àndomelo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò àntolo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò àntomelo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò é-lo/B0 erò
SFX b1 erò ée-lo/B0 erò
SFX b1 erò éelo/B0 erò
SFX b1 erò émelo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò émolo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò émomelo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò éndolo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò éndomelo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò éntolo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò éntomelo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò érmelo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò évelo/B0 erò
SFX b1 erò ímelo/G1 erò
SFX b1 erò ónmelo/G1 erò
SFX b1 rò lo/B0 erò
SFX b1 rò lo/G1 erò
SFX b1 rò ve-lo/B0 erò
SFX b1 rò velo/B0 erò
SFX b1 ò alo/B0 ò
SFX b1 ò ave-lo/B0 ò
SFX b1 ò iónmelo/G1 ò
SFX b1 ò à-lo/B0 ò
SFX b1 ò àe-lo/B0 ò
SFX b1 ò àelo/B0 ò
SFX b1 ò àvelo/B0 ò
SFX b1 ò émolo/G1 ò
SFX b1 ò émomelo/G1 ò
SFX b1 ò íe-lo/B0 ò
SFX b1 ò íelo/B0 ò
SFX b1 ò íselo/Q1 ò
SFX b1 ò ónmelo/G1 ò

# vèrbi '-er/'-ar
# themeT1 + [ea]r/b0b1b2E0E1E2
# themeT4 + rò/b0b1b2J0
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2E0E1E2I0J0
SFX b2 Y 40
SFX b2 0 meƚo/G2 [ae]r
SFX b2 ar àrmeƚo/G2 ar
SFX b2 er érmeƚo/G2 er
SFX b2 erò eƚo/B0 erò
SFX b2 erò iónmeƚo/G2 [^cijɉñ]erò
SFX b2 erò iƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò àndomeƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò àndoƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò àntomeƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò àntoƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò é-ƚo/B0 erò
SFX b2 erò ée-ƚo/B0 erò
SFX b2 erò éeƚo/B0 erò
SFX b2 erò émeƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò émomeƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò émoƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò éndomeƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò éndoƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò éntomeƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò éntoƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò érmeƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò éveƚo/B0 erò
SFX b2 erò ímeƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 erò ónmeƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 rò ve-ƚo/B0 erò
SFX b2 rò veƚo/B0 erò
SFX b2 rò ƚo/G2 erò
SFX b2 ò ave-ƚo/B0 ò
SFX b2 ò aƚo/B0 ò
SFX b2 ò iónmeƚo/G2 ò
SFX b2 ò à-ƚo/B0 ò
SFX b2 ò àe-ƚo/B0 ò
SFX b2 ò àeƚo/B0 ò
SFX b2 ò àveƚo/B0 ò
SFX b2 ò émomeƚo/G2 ò
SFX b2 ò émoƚo/G2 ò
SFX b2 ò íe-ƚo/B0 ò
SFX b2 ò íeƚo/B0 ò
SFX b2 ò íseƚo/Q2 ò
SFX b2 ò ónmeƚo/G2 ò
