public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
benedíxer/b0b1b2n0n1n2E0E1E2
dixdíxer/b0b1b2n0n1n2E0E1E2
interdíxer/b0b1b2n0n1n2E0E1E2
intradíxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
intredíxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
kontradíxer/b0b1b2n0n1n2E0E1E2
maledíxer/b0b1n0n1E0E1
maƚedíxer/b0b2n0n2E0E2
soradíxer/b0b1b2n0n1n2E0E1E2
véder/b0b1b2E0E1E2^0=0.0@0
vedarò/b0b1b2J0^0=0.0
inprevederò/b0b1b2J0
intravederò/b0b1b2J0
malvederò/b0b1b2J0
provederò/b0b1b2J0+0
ravederò/b0b1b2J0
travederò/b0b1b2J0
ʼñerò/b0b1b2J0
veñarò/b0b1b2J0+0.0@0
arveñarò/b0b1b2J0
intarveñarò/b0b1b2J0
intreveñarò/b0b1b2J0
intraveñarò/b0b1b2J0
konveñarò/b0b1b2J0+0*0
kontraveñarò/b0b1b2J0
parveñarò/b0b1b2J0
rinveñarò/b0b1b2J0
soveñarò/b0b1b2J0.0
soraveñarò/b0b1b2J0
arvéñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
intrevéñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
konvéñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2+0*0
parvéñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sovéñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0
meterò/b0b1b2J0^0+0.0,0@0
emeterò/b0b1b2J0
intrometerò/b0b1b2J0
kometerò/b0b1b2J0*0
malmeterò/b0b1b2J0
manometerò/b0b1b2J0
ometerò/b0b1b2J0
permeterò/b0b1b2J0
permetarò/b0b1b2J0
prometerò/b0b1b2J0+0-0:0
sotometerò/b0b1b2J0
trameterò/b0b1b2J0
traxmeterò/b0b1b2J0
krederò/b0b1b2J0=0.0
teñerò/b0b1b2J0.0,0@0:0
aparteñerò/b0b1b2J0
asteñerò/b0b1b2J0
inkonteñerò/b0b1b2J0
intrateñerò/b0b1b2J0
manteñerò/b0b1b2J0
oteñerò/b0b1b2J0
perteñerò/b0b1b2J0
sosteñerò/b0b1b2J0
substeñerò/b0b1b2J0
susteñerò/b0b1b2J0
trateñerò/b0b1b2J0
téñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0,0@0:0
astéñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
intratéñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
otéñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sostéñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sustéñar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
konoserò/b0b1b2J0.0
viverò/b0b1b2J0.0:0
soraviverò/b0b1b2J0
verderò/b0b1J0
verxerò/b0b1b2J0
riésar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
korespóndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
respóndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
skrívar/b0b1b2E0E1E2-0.0,0
koskrívar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
iskrívar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
soraskrívar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sotoskrívar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
traskrívar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
persèguer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
prosèguer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
pèrder/b0b1b2E0E1E2+0
rénder/b0b1b2E0E1E2@0
kórer/b0b1b2E0E1E2r0=0+0-0*0.0,0:0
okórer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
perkórer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
perkórar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sokórer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
traskórer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
dúxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2^0-0.0:0
dedúxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2^0
introdúxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
prodúxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
rekondúxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
reprodúxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sedúxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
tradúxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
strénder/b0b1E0E1.0@0:0
strénxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0@0:0
kostrénder/b0b1E0E1
kostrénxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
póner/b0b1b2E0E1E2^0+0-0.0,0@0
antepóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
espóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
frapóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
konpóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2+0
kontrapóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
opóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
pospóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
prexupóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
propóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2+0
rekonpóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
skonpóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sorapóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
soraespóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sotopóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
supóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
xustapóner/b0b1b2E0E1E2
tèmer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
dexinprímer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
inprímer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
reprímer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
pénđer/b0b1E0E1-0,0
pénxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2-0,0
pénxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2-0,0
spénxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0
fénder/b0b1b2E0E1E2*0,0
ofénder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
rèxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2r0
korèxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sòrxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0
asúmer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
konsúmer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
ténder/b0b1b2E0E1E2^0=0+0-0.0@0
enténder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
esténder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
perinténder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
perinténdar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
preinténder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
proténder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sorainténder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sorinténder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sotinténder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
inténder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
devídar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
divídar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
esklúdar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
konklúdar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
inklúdar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
oklúdar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
kovèrđer/b0b1E0E1+0*0.0
kovèrxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2+0*0.0
kuèrđer/b0b1E0E1+0*0
kuèrxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2+0*0
sòlvar/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0-0,0@0
ŧederò/b0b1J0T4:0@0
sedarò/b0b1b2J0:0@0
prosederò/b0b1b2J0
retroséder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
retrosédar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
susederò/b0b1b2J0
susedarò/b0b1b2J0
intersederò/b0b1b2J0
intarsedarò/b0b1b2J0
intresederò/b0b1b2J0
intreŧederò/b0b1J0
venŧerò/b0b1J0:0
nàser/b0b1b2E0E1E2r0.0
nàsar/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0
malnàser/b0b1b2E0E1E2
malnàsar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
piàxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2+0:0
piàxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2+0:0
đónđer/b0b1E0E1,0@0:0
xónxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2,0@0:0
xónxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2,0@0:0
arđónđer/b0b1E0E1
arxónxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
dexdónder/b0b1E0E1
dexxónxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
dexxónxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
indónder/b0b1E0E1
inxónxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
inxónxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
radónder/b0b1E0E1
raxónxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
raxónxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sodónder/b0b1E0E1
soxónxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
soxónxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
soradónder/b0b1E0E1
soraxónxer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
soraxónxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
exíster/b0b1b2E0E1E2
exístar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
ríder/b0b1b2E0E1E2,0
rídar/b0b1b2E0E1E2,0
daríder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
darídar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
soríder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sorídar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
konóser/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0
konósar/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0
lèđer/b0b1E0E1.0
lèxar/b0b1E0E1.0
ƚèxar/b0b2E0E2.0
préndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0:0
intrapréndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
péndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2-0,0
despéndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
propéndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
spéndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0
sospéndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
suspéndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
móver/b0b1b2E0E1E2*0.0
komòver/b0b1b2E0E1E2
promòver/b0b1b2E0E1E2
desíder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
desídar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
insiderò/b0b1b2J0
inŧiderò/b0b1J0
reŧíder/b0b1E0E1
resídar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
reŧeverò/b0b1J0
béver/b0b1b2E0E1E2=0-0
bevarò/b0b1b2J0=0-0
véndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2^0*0.0
mixvéndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
destínguer/b0b1b2E0E1E2
rónpar/b0b1b2E0E1E2,0
intarónpar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
korónpar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
gàldar/b0b1b2E0E1E2-0
gòdar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
vòlxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2=0+0-0*0.0
koinvòlxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
skonvòlxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2,0
ravòlxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
fóndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0:0
bàtar/b0b1b2E0E1E2-0*0.0,0:0
kontrobàtar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
skóndar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
konpètar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
repètar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
akòrxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2-0
inkòrxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
skòrxar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
sedarò/b0b1b2J0:0@0
prosederò/b0b1b2J0
retroséder/b0b1b2E0E1E2
retrosédar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
susederò/b0b1b2J0
intersederò/b0b1b2J0
intresederò/b0b1b2J0
intreŧederò/b0b1J0
akadarò/b0b1b2J0
deskaderò/b0b1J0
baterò/b0b1b2J0-0*0.0,0:0
kontrobaterò/b0b1b2J0
kontrobatarò/b0b1b2J0
pianxerò/b0b1b2J0
pianxarò/b0b1b2J0
renpianxerò/b0b1b2J0
renpianxarò/b0b1b2J0
taxerò/b0b1b2J0
venserò/b0b1b2J0
venŧerò/b0b1J0
konvénsar/b0b1b2E0E1E2
vinserò/b0b1b2J0
konvínser/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0
konvínsar/b0b1b2E0E1E2.0
kreserò/b0b1b2J0.0,0:0
renkreserò/b0b1b2J0
renkresarò/b0b1b2J0
asisterò/b0b1b2J0
konsisterò/b0b1b2J0
konsistarò/b0b1b2J0
insisterò/b0b1b2J0
traerò/b0b1b2o0J0+0.0,0@0:0
astraerò/b0b1b2o0J0
sotraerò/b0b1b2o0J0
subtraerò/b0b1b2o0J0
destruxarò/b0b1b2J0
prenderò/b0b1b2J0.0:0
intraprendarò/b0b1b2J0
sorprenderò/b0b1b2J0
rexistarò/b0b1b2J0
